Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:(1) The board shall not require a nursing education program to meet standards beyond those required for national accreditation.(2) The board shall not require a nursing education program accredited by a national nursing education accreditation body to produce a study aligning its policies and procedures with those of the board. An accreditation self-study and all documentation submitted to a national nursing education accreditation body shall be deemed to meet the board requirements.(3) The board may require a nursing education program required to produce findings, recommendations, or a corrective action plan to a national nursing education accreditation body to also provide such findings, recommendations, or corrective action plan to the board. The board shall not require additional corrective action or documentation showing corrective action response beyond those determined by a national nursing education accreditation body.(4) The board shall provide technical assistance for a corrective action plan to nursing education programs with a national council licensure examination pass rate below 80 percent.(5) The board shall expedite approval of new nursing education program applications for institutions of higher education with approved and national accredited nursing programs.(6) The board may require only the simulation director and the lead nurse educator to be certified in clinical simulation.(7) The board may require continued professional development for nurse educators subject to appropriation or availability of adequate resources.(8) For purposes of this section:(a) "National nursing education accreditation body" means an independent nonprofit entity approved by the United States department of education as a body that evaluates and approves the quality of nursing education programs within the United States and territories.(b) "Nursing education program" means a division or department within a state supported educational institution or other public institution of higher education, charged with the responsibility of preparing nursing students and nurses to qualify for initial licensing or higher levels of nursing practice.--- END ---